local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vber"/>
    <sdef n="vbhar"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical (normal) verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbs"/>
    <sdef n="vbaux" c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="part" c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pret"/>
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="ut"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="ea"/>
    <sdef n="da"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="pst"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="ssup"/>
    <sdef n="nst"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="indef" c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular and plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Number"/>
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="sent" c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question mark"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
        <re>¿</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="JO__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="d/en__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/enna__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enna</l>
          <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etta</l>
          <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="diskret__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktiv__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fri__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="blygsam__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mare</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>maste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mast</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="den"><i>d</i><par n="d/en__det"/></e>
    <e lm="denna"><i>d</i><par n="d/enna__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="denen"><i>den</i><par n="d/en__det"/></e>
    <e lm="allvarlig"><i>allvarlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blygsam"><i>blygsam</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="central"><i>central</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diskret"><i>diskret</i><par n="diskret__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrbar"><i>dyrbar</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fattig"><i>fattig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fri"><i>fri</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ful"><i>ful</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grym"><i>grym</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gul"><i>gul</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gynnsam"><i>gynnsam</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="het"><i>het</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kall"><i>kall</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liberal"><i>liberal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ljudlig"><i>ljudlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ljum"><i>ljum</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lojal"><i>lojal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lydig"><i>lydig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naiv"><i>naiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neutral"><i>neutral</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ny"><i>ny</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nyttig"><i>nyttig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oklar"><i>oklar</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="otacksam"><i>otacksam</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="otrevlig"><i>otrevlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rik"><i>rik</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sjuk"><i>sjuk</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="smutsig"><i>smutsig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stark"><i>stark</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stum"><i>stum</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="styv"><i>styv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svart"><i>svart</i><par n="diskret__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svensk"><i>svensk</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tacksam"><i>tacksam</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tolerant"><i>tolerant</i><par n="diskret__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tom"><i>tom</i><par n="blygsam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trevlig"><i>trevlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tydlig"><i>tydlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vek"><i>vek</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ajabaja"><i>ajabaja</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="baja"><i>baja</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bravo"><i>bravo</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dada"><i>dada</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="godkväll"><i>godkväll</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="gudskelov"><i>gudskelov</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hej"><i>hej</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hokus"><i>hokus</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hå"><i>hå</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jadu"><i>jadu</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jamen"><i>jamen</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jestanes"><i>jestanes</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jorå"><i>jorå</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="lala"><i>lala</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nejdå"><i>nejdå</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nädu"><i>nädu</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nåväl"><i>nåväl</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ojdå"><i>ojdå</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="prosit"><i>prosit</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sch"><i>sch</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="skål"><i>skål</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tja"><i>tja</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tvi"><i>tvi</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="varsågoda"><i>varsågoda</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="äsch"><i>äsch</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="åhå"><i>åhå</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="öh"><i>öh</i><par n="JO__ij"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
